Utah statutes.
20A-9-401.   Primary elections.

(1)  This part shall be construed liberally so as to ensure full opportunity for persons to become candidates and for voters to express their choice.

(2)  This part may not be construed to govern or regulate the internal procedures of a registered political party.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1994 General Session

